Hawaii statutes.
[§371-19.2] Hawaii healthcare workforce
advisory board; established. (a) There is established within the
department, for administrative purposes, the Hawaii healthcare workforce
advisory board, which shall include the following members or their designees:

(1) The director, who shall serve as the chair;

(2) The director of health;

(3) The director of the Hawaii/Pacific basin area
health education center;

(4) The director of the University of Hawaii at Manoa
office of public health studies;

(5) One chancellor of a community college within the
University of Hawaii system, to be selected by the other members of the Hawaii
healthcare workforce advisory board;

(6) One member representing a nurse training program;
and

(7) Three representatives from Hawaii's health care
community that represent a variety of health care disciplines. The
representatives shall be selected by the other members of the Hawaii healthcare
workforce advisory board and shall serve two-year terms.

(b) Section 26-34 shall not apply to the
Hawaii healthcare workforce advisory board.

(c) The Hawaii healthcare workforce advisory
board shall:

(1) Advise the department on strategies for developing
the health care industry workforce, including recommending projects and
programs to promote the expansion and development of the health care industry;

(2) Develop a mission, objectives, and goals with
particular attention to efforts in pre-service programs and opportunities; and

(3) Advise the department in developing partnerships
with health care providers, organizations, and stakeholders to further the
Hawaii healthcare workforce advisory board's mission and objectives.

(d) Members of the Hawaii healthcare workforce
advisory board shall serve without compensation; provided that the representatives
from the health care community shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties. [L 2015, c 166, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next